Wyoming statutes. Title 22 Elections
Article 5. Offices and Terms

§§ 22-23-501 and 22-23-502.
[Renumbered.]

Renumbered as

15-11-101

and

15-11-102

by Laws 1998, ch. 100, § 4.

Cross references. —

For present provisions, see §§

15-11-101

and

15-11-102

.

§ 22-23-503.
[Amended and renumbered.]

Amended and renumbered as

15-11-103

by Laws 1998, ch. 100, § 3.

Cross references. —

For present provisions, see §

15-11-103

.

§§ 22-23-504 through 22-23-506.
[Renumbered.]

Renumbered as

15-11-104

through

15-11-106

by Laws 1998, ch. 100, § 4.

Cross references. —

For present provisions, see §§

15-11-104

through

15-11-106

.

§ 22-23-507.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 100, § 5.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1, prevented an interim vacancy in a municipal elective office prior to the effective date of the act.